Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.255

Liability coverage of university personnel and students—As exclusive authority.

RCW 28B.20.250 through 28B.20.255 constitutes the exclusive authority for the board of regents of the University of Washington to provide liability coverage for its regents, officers, employees, agents, and students, and further provides the means for defending and payment of all such actions, claims, or proceedings. RCW 28B.20.250 through 28B.20.255 shall govern notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 4.92 RCW and RCW 28B.10.842 and 28B.10.844.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 12 s 3.]